Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4718.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 4506. (1) After completing a good-faith investigation, an insurer who reasonably believes or knows that a fraudulent insurance act has occurred under section 4503 and involves a Michigan policyholder or a claim for benefits submitted through the assigned claims plan shall send to the director, on a form prescribed by the director, the information requested by the form and any additional information relative to the factual circumstances of the alleged fraudulent insurance act and the parties claiming loss or damages or information that the director may require. The director shall review reports and make any further investigation the director considers necessary. If the director considers it appropriate after investigation, the director may report the suspected fraudulent insurance act to the insurer, the appropriate authorized agency, the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the fraudulent insurance act occurred, or the attorney general. (2) This section does not require an insurer to submit to the director the form under subsection (1) in either of the following circumstances: (a) The insurer's initial investigation indicated a potentially fraudulent insurance act, but further investigation revealed that the act was not a fraudulent insurance act. (b) The insurer does not have reasonable grounds to believe that a fraudulent insurance act occurred. (3) This section does not relieve an insurer of the insurer's obligations to also report suspected violations of law to an authorized agency. (4) An authorized agency shall submit all papers, documents, reports, complaints, or other facts or evidence to the director on request. The authorized agency shall otherwise assist and cooperate with the director's investigation under this section. (5) As used in this section, "insurer" means any of the following: (a) An insurer as that term is defined in section 106. (b) The Michigan automobile insurance placement facility created under chapter 33. (c) A person designated to administer a claim for benefits through the assigned claims plan under sections 3171 to 3175 on behalf of the Michigan automobile insurance placement facility created under chapter 33.